Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201349-1469.06
Businesses
and organizations; separate segregated political fund; contributions and expenditures;
limitations.

(1) All contributions to and expenditures
from a separate segregated political fund shall be limited to money or anything
of ascertainable value obtained through the voluntary contributions of the
employees, officers, directors, stockholders, or members of the corporation,
including a nonprofit corporation, labor organization, industry, trade, or professional association, limited liability company, or limited
liability partnership, and the affiliates thereof, under which
such fund was established.

(2) No contribution or expenditure shall be received or made
from such fund if obtained or made by using or threatening to use job discrimination
or financial reprisals.

(3) Only expenditures to candidates and committees and independent
expenditures may be made from a fund established by an
entity specified in subsection (1) of section 49-1469. Such separate
segregated political fund may receive and disburse funds for the purpose of
supporting or opposing candidates and committees in elections in states other
than Nebraska and candidates for federal office and making independent expenditures
in such elections if such receipts and disbursements are made in conformity
with the solicitation provisions of this section and the entity which
establishes and administers such fund complies with the laws of the jurisdiction
in which such receipts or disbursements are made.

(4) The expenses for establishment and administration of
a separate segregated political fund of any such entity may be paid
from the separate segregated political fund of such entity.

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 21;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 20.
January 1, 2014